North Carolina, session 2025, HB1004.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HUBS PILOT
SECTION 1.(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina shall select up to eight constituent institutions of The University of
North Carolina to serve as Artificial Intelligence Hubs (AI Hubs) in this State. At least one AI
Hub shall be one of North Carolina's Public Historically Black Colleges and Universities or North
Carolina's Historically American Indian University, the University of North Carolina at
Pembroke. Each AI Hub shall convene industry and academia to ensure that artificial intelligence
(i) generates economic growth for the State of North Carolina and (ii) protects the rights and
liberties of the citizens of this State.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the following sums
for AI Hubs in this State:
(1) Sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated
equally among constituent institutions selected for an AI Hub pursuant to this
section, to establish AI Hubs, including necessary infrastructure. These funds
shall not be made available to a selected constituent institution until that
institution matches ten percent (10%) of the funds made available pursuant to
this subdivision with non-State funds.
(2) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in recurring funds to be allocated equally
among each constituent institution selected for an AI Hub pursuant to this
section. These funds shall be used for operational support and personnel
needed for the AI Hubs, including to establish an expert in residence position
at each AI Hub.

PART II. TECHNOLOGY HUBS
*H1004-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to each constituent institution
to establish a technology hub or support previously designated Artificial Intelligence (AI) Hub
at the institution to encourage (i) technology innovation, (ii) workforce upskilling, (iii)
entrepreneurship, and (iv) advanced manufacturing. These funds may be used for capital needs,
marketing, personnel, programming, support services, local partnerships, and any other purpose
necessary to establish the technology hub. Constituent institutions shall report to the Board of
Governors on the departments, units, and schools included in the technology hub, and Board of
Governors shall report this information to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee
no later than February 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for allocation to the North Carolina Collaboratory
established by G.S. 116-255, the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to establish a grant fund for research projects on Artificial
Intelligence (AI). To qualify for grant funding, a research project must focus on one of the
following areas of scope:
(1) Involve applied AI research to develop an application in one of the following
priority areas:
a. Education.
b. Workforce development.
c. Healthcare.
d. Government.
(2) Pertain to AI fundamentals and infrastructure by addressing core AI
technologies (including, but not limited to, machine learning, natural language
processing, and computer vision) and how the technologies contribute to
advancing AI infrastructure.
(3) Pertain to AI ethics and governance by addressing ethical considerations
related to the use of AI and consideration of relevant AI risks and governance
frameworks.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 1004-First Edition